Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-163
Inclusion of lands; hearing; assent of parties; when implied.

The board of directors, at the time and place mentioned in the notice, or at such other time or times to which the hearing of the petition may be adjourned shall proceed to hear the petition, and all the objections thereto, presented in writing by any person, showing cause as aforesaid, why the proposed change of the boundaries of the district should not be made. The failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed change of its boundaries, to show cause in writing as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an assent on his part to the change of the boundaries of the district, as prayed for in the petition, or to such a change thereof as will include a part of the lands. The filing of such petition with the board as aforesaid shall be deemed and taken as an assent on the part of each and all of such petitioners to such a change of the boundaries that they may include the whole or any portion of the lands described in the petition.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 36, p. 292;

R.S.1913, § 3494;

C.S.1922, § 2894;

C.S.1929, § 46-139;

R.S.1943, § 46-163.